Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2305
Out-of-state trust company; instate branch trust offices; authorized.

An out-of-state trust company may establish and maintain branch trust offices in Nebraska only if (1) the requirements of sections 8-2306 and 8-2307 are met and (2) the home state of the out-of-state trust company authorizes the establishment and maintenance of branch trust offices in that state by a Nebraska trust company under conditions no more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of Nebraska, as determined by the director.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 58.